District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1217.13

Contents of condemnation petition

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 719, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-202 to 7-214.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-215, 7-216.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-218, 7-219.